Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 3. Services and Facilities.

Collateral references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Utilities, §§ 236 — 239.

73B C.J.S., Public Utilities, § 44.

Sec. 42.05.291.
Standards of service and facilities.

Each public utility shall furnish and maintain adequate, efficient, and safe service and facilities. This service shall be reasonably continuous and without unreasonable interruption or delay.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter and the regulations or orders of the commission, a public utility may establish reasonable rules and regulations governing the conditions under which it will render service.

The commission may upon its own motion or upon complaint, after providing reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, adopt as to service and facilities, including the crossing of facilities, just and reasonable standards, classifications, regulations, and practices to be furnished, imposed, observed, and followed by public utilities; adopt adequate and reasonable standards for the measurement of quantity, quality, pressure, initial voltage, or other conditions pertaining to the supply of the service of public utilities; adopt reasonable regulations for the examination and testing of the service, and for the measurement of it; adopt or approve reasonable regulations, specifications, and standards to secure the accuracy of meters and appliances for measurement; and provide for the examination and testing of appliances used for the measurement of a service of a public utility. In doing so, the commission shall conform to the standard practices of the industry.

If the commission upon its own motion or upon complaint, after providing reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, finds that the service or facilities of a public utility are unreasonable, unsafe, inadequate, insufficient, or unreasonably discriminatory, or otherwise in violation of this chapter, the commission shall prescribe, by regulation or order, the reasonable, safe, adequate, sufficient service or facilities to be observed, furnished, enforced, or employed, including all repairs, changes, alterations, extensions, substitutions, or improvements in facilities that are reasonably necessary and proper for the safety, accommodation, and convenience of the public.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For regulatory policy standards, see 3 AAC 50, art. 1.

For cogeneration and small power production, see 3 AAC 50, art. 2.

For gas utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 1.

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For criteria for intrastate interexchange telephone competition, see 3 AAC 52, art. 4.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For water and wastewater utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 8.

For local exchange competition, see 3 AAC 53, art. 4.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

For public interest pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 9.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.296.
Telecommunications services for certain disabled subscribers.

The commission shall adopt regulations to require telecommunications utilities to provide service to subscribers who are deaf, hard of hearing, and speech disabled that permits the subscriber to communicate by one or more telecommunications devices with persons of normal hearing and that makes available reasonable access of all phases of public telecommunications service to subscribers of telecommunications services who are deaf, hard of hearing, and speech disabled. The regulations must provide for cost recovery through surcharges added to the rate for each telecommunications service. The commission shall hold hearings to determine the most cost-effective method of providing this service.

A telecommunications service subscriber is eligible for the service required by (a) of this section if the subscriber is a person who is certified as deaf, hard of hearing, or speech disabled by a licensed physician, a speech-language pathologist licensed under AS 08.11, an audiologist, or the Department of Health and Social Services or if the subscriber is an organization that represents or has a principal purpose to provide services to persons who are deaf, hard of hearing, or speech disabled as determined by the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1992; am § 20 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For criteria for the provision of telecommunications relay service for the deaf, hard of hearing, and speech impaired, see 3 AAC 51, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, rewrote (a); in (b), substituted “telecommunications service” for “telephone” near the beginning, inserted “a person who is” following “if the subscriber is”, twice substituted “disabled” for “impaired”, substituted “that represents or has a principal purpose to provide services to persons who are deaf” for “representing the deaf”.

Sec. 42.05.300.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.301.
Discrimination in service.

Except as provided in AS

42.05.306

, a public utility may not, as to service, make or grant an unreasonable preference or advantage to any person or subject any person to an unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage. A public utility may not establish or maintain or provide an unreasonable difference as to service, either as between localities or as between classes of service, but nothing in this section prohibits the establishment of reasonable classifications of service or requires unreasonable investment in facilities.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For cogeneration and small power production, see 3 AAC 50, art. 2.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

Discrimination in provision of municipal services or facilities as civil rights violation. 51 ALR3d 950.

Civil rights: racial or religious discrimination in furnishing of public utilities, services or facilities. 53 ALR3d 1027.

Use priorities: validity of imposition, by state regulation, of natural gas use priorities. 84 ALR3d 541.

Sec. 42.05.306.
Discounted service and reduced rate.

A public utility may provide a discounted service or a reduced rate for essential local exchange telecommunication services to individuals who receive benefits from a means test social services assistance program administered by the state or federal government. The commission may not require a utility to provide a discounted service or reduced rate or to incur uncompensated costs or administrative burdens for services provided under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For universal service fund, see 3 AAC 53, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

Validity of preferential utility rates for elderly or low-income persons. 29 ALR4th 615.

Sec. 42.05.310.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.311.
Joint use and interconnection of facilities.

A public utility having sewers, conduits, utilidors, poles, pole lines, pipes, pipelines, mains, or other distribution or transmission facilities shall, for a reasonable compensation, permit another public utility to use them when the public convenience and necessity require this use and the use will not result in substantial injury to the owner, or in substantial detriment to the service to the customers of the owners. The cost of modifications or additions necessary to a joint use shall be at the expense of the public utility requesting the use of the facilities.

A telecommunications utility shall permit connection to be made and service to be furnished between a system operated by it and the system or toll facilities operated by another public utility or with the communications facility or system of a nonutility, or between its toll facilities and the toll facilities of another public utility, when public convenience and necessity require the connection and the connection will not result in substantial injury to the owner or other users of the facilities of either public utility or in substantial detriment to the service of either public utility.

The tariff of a public utility shall include rules setting out the terms and conditions under which it will construct, or permit its customers or subscribers to construct, and install lines, cables, radio links, or pipes from its existing facilities to the premises of applicants for service.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Cross references. —

For applicability of this section to otherwise exempt utilities, see AS

42.05.321(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For criteria for the provision of telecommunications relay service for the deaf, hard of hearing, and speech impaired, see 3 AAC 51, art. 1.

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

For joint use of utility facilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 9.

For procedures for changing an authorized telecommunications carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 3.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

For public interest pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 9.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

Sec. 42.05.320.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.321.
Failure to agree upon joint use or interconnection.

In case of failure to agree upon the joint use or interconnection of facilities or the conditions or compensation for joint use or interconnections, the public utility, including any municipality, or an interested person may apply to the commission for an order requiring the interconnection. If, after investigation and opportunity for hearing, the commission finds that public convenience and necessity require the joint use or connection, and that the use or connection will not result in substantial injury to the owner utility or its customers, or in substantial detriment to the services furnished by the owner utility, or in the creation of safety hazards, it shall

order that the use be permitted;

prescribe reasonable conditions and compensation for the joint use;

order the interconnection to be made;

determine the time and manner of the interconnection;

determine the apportionment of costs and responsibility for operation and maintenance of the interconnection.

This section and AS

42.05.311

apply to all utilities whether or not they are exempt from other regulation under AS

42.05.711

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 136 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

For criteria for the provision of telecommunications relay service for the deaf, hard of hearing, and speech impaired, see 3 AAC 51, art. 1.

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For joint use of utility facilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 9.

For procedures for changing an authorized telecommunications carrier, see 3 AAC 53, art. 3.

For criteria for the provision of pay-per-call telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 6.

For criteria for the provision of statewide directory assistance, see 3 AAC 53, art. 7.

For state telecommunications modernization plan, see 3 AAC 53, art. 8.

For public interest pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 9.

For criteria for the provision of private pay telephone service, see 3 AAC 53, art. 10.

Sec. 42.05.325.
Registration and regulation of alternate operator services.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 24 SLA 2019.]

Sec. 42.05.330.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.331.
Standards for measurement.

The commission shall establish by regulation adequate, fair, and realistic standards for the measurement of quality, pressure, voltage, or other conditions of utility services and shall prescribe reasonable regulations for examination and testing of the service and the accuracy of the devices used to measure it.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For telephone utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 3.

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

Sec. 42.05.340.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.341.
Testing of meter standards.

The commission shall provide by regulation for the periodic testing and certification of meter standards by laboratories acceptable to the commission.
The commission shall also provide by regulation for the taking of appeals to the commission from the findings of a utility that tests its own meters or appliances for measurement.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970)

Administrative Code. —

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

Sec. 42.05.350.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 42.05.351.
Testing of appliances.

The commission shall provide for the examination and testing of appliances used for the measuring of a service of a public utility and may purchase equipment, apparatus, and standards required for this purpose. The commissioner of transportation and public facilities may assign the examination and testing function to appropriate staff of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS 45.75. Upon the payment of a reasonable fee established by the commission, a consumer may have an appliance that is used by the consumer tested. The commission shall establish by regulation allowable tolerances with respect to the functioning or operation of the appliance. If the measuring appliance does not perform within these tolerances, the utility concerned shall pay the costs of the test by reimbursing the person requesting the test for the fee paid by that person. This reimbursement shall be made no later than at the time of the next regular billing following the test.

History.

(§ 6 ch 113 SLA 1970; am § 43 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 84 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 17 ch 168 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 98 § 7 (1997))

Administrative Code. —

For electric utilities, see 3 AAC 52, art. 5.

Sec. 42.05.360.
[Repealed, § 5 ch 113 SLA 1970.]